Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-405
Board of Educational Lands and Funds; field notes of Surveyor General of the United States; custody.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds, as such custodian, shall provide for and safely keep in its office all the surveys, field notes, maps, charts, records, and all other papers mentioned in section 84-404, the same as other public records are kept in its office.

Laws 1889, c. 84, § 3, p. 568;

R.S.1913, § 5561;

C.S.1922, § 4865;

C.S.1929, § 84-404;

R.S.1943, § 84-405.